Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF3323.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin DRIVER'S LICENSE RECIPROCAL AGREEMENTS.new text end new text begin (a) For purposes of this section, "foreign jurisdiction" means a jurisdiction that is not, and is not within, the United States, the Commonwealth of the Northern Mariana Islands, the Commonwealth of Puerto Rico, Guam, the United States Virgin Islands, or a territory of the United States. new text end new text begin (b) The commissioner of public safety must investigate establishment of reciprocal driver licensing agreements to provide for minimal administrative burdens in the exchange of driver's license issuance between Minnesota and other licensing jurisdictions. The investigation must include a review of each foreign jurisdiction with which at least ten states have entered into a reciprocal agreement. new text end new text begin (c) By October 1, 2025, the commissioner must commence activity to negotiate a reciprocal driver licensing agreement with each foreign jurisdiction identified under paragraph (b), unless the commissioner: new text end new text begin (1) determines that a reciprocal agreement with a specified foreign jurisdiction is not reasonable based on public safety or other articulated concerns; and new text end new text begin (2) submits a notification to the chairs and ranking minority members of the legislative committees with jurisdiction over transportation policy and finance regarding the investigation findings and rationale for the determination. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective the day following final enactment. new text end